Utah statutes.
9-8-306.   Archaeological or anthropological landmarks.

(1)  Sites of significance may be recommended to and approved by the board as state archaeological or anthropological landmarks.  No privately owned site or site on school or institutional trust lands may be so designated without the written consent of the owner.

(2)  A person may not excavate upon a privately owned designated landmark without a permit from the division.

(3)  Before any alteration is commenced on a designated landmark, three months' notice of intent to alter the site shall be given the division.



Amended by Chapter 170, 1995 General Session

